Louisiana, session 2026, HB547.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1461.3(C)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1461.3. Election offenses affecting election officials or watchers; penalties
* * *
C. No person shall knowingly, willfully, or intentionally:
* * *
(5) Photograph, record, or otherwise reproduce voter registration information
in precinct registers, except while performing his duties as a clerk of court or an
employee of a clerk, an election day or early voting commissioner, a registrar of
voters or an employee of a registrar, or the secretary of state or an employee of the
secretary of state.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.